Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5705.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "Michigan state police patrolling accountability: you shoulder the cost act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of state police. (b) "Freeway" means that term as defined under section 18a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.18a. (c) "Highway or street" means that term as defined in section 20 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.20. (d) "Law enforcement report" means a crash report or other incident report generated by a local law enforcement agency as the result of the local law enforcement agency responding to an incident on a freeway or highway or street. (e) "Local law enforcement agency" means any agency whose primary purpose is to perform the law enforcement functions of a local unit of government. (f) "Local unit of government" means a city, village, county, or township. (g) "Other incident report" means a report for any type of incident that is not a crash report. Sec. 3. (1) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of this act, if all of the following apply, a local law enforcement agency that responds to a report of an incident that occurred on a freeway or highway or street may submit a request for reimbursement to the department for the local law enforcement agency's expenses incurred in responding to that incident: (a) The department does not have a law enforcement officer available to respond to the report of the incident. (b) The department requests the local law enforcement agency respond to the report of the incident. (c) The freeway or highway or street is under the authority of the department of transportation. (d) The local law enforcement agency prepared a law enforcement report for the incident. (2) Subject to section 7, a local law enforcement agency shall submit a request for reimbursement in a manner and form prescribed by the director of the department. Sec. 5. (1) If a local law enforcement agency requests reimbursement under section 3 and provides the law enforcement report for the incident to the department, the department, on appropriation, shall reimburse the local law enforcement agency for the cost of the response by the local law enforcement agency. (2) The director of the department shall prescribe the forms and processes by which a local law enforcement agency may request reimbursement under section 3. (3) The director of the department shall annually set reimbursement rates for a response by a local law enforcement agency to a report of an incident under this act. (4) The director of the department shall annually report on the number of reports of an incident responded to by local law enforcement agencies and reimbursed under this act. The report required under this section must be organized by the county in which the report responses occurred and the type of local unit of government that responded. Sec. 7. (1) A local law enforcement agency shall submit all requests for reimbursement under section 3 once per quarter as prescribed by the director of the department. (2) The department shall accept and process reimbursement or provide written notice to a local law enforcement agency as to why a reimbursement request is denied not more than 30 days after receipt of a reimbursement request under subsection (1).